Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.572

Certain unlawful acts—Disciplinary authority exception.

The crimes defined in RCW 28B.10.570 and 28B.10.571 shall not apply to school administrators or teachers who are engaged in the reasonable exercise of their disciplinary authority.

[ 2003 c 53 s 173; 1970 ex.s. c 98 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.76.602.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 98: See note following RCW 28B.10.570.